Wyoming, session 2025, HB0246.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 8-4-118 is created to read:
8-4-118. Wyoming Wednesday.
(a) In celebration of the state of Wyoming and in an
effort to bring unity to the state's communities, the
second Wednesday of every month shall be known as "Wyoming
Wednesday – Brown and Gold Day". Wyoming citizens may wear
brown and gold in recognition of Wyoming Wednesday.
(b) The governor, not later than July 10, 2025, and
not more than once each year thereafter in advance of a
Wyoming Wednesday, shall issue a proclamation requesting
proper observance of "Wyoming Wednesday – Brown and Gold
Day" as outlined in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) This section shall not affect commercial paper,
the making or execution of written agreements or judicial
proceedings, or authorize public schools, businesses or
state and local government offices to close.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0246
ENROLLED ACT NO. 78, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2